Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1836.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 41, chapter 11, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 41-1604.21, to read: START_STATUTE41-1604.21. Bed capacity; annual report On or before November 1 of each year, the department shall provide a report on bed capacity to the joint legislative budget committee. The report must: 1. Reflect the bed capacity for each security classification by gender at each state correctional facility and private prison, divided by rated and total beds. 2. Include bed capacity data at the end of the previous two fiscal years and the projected capacity at the end of the current fiscal year, as well as the reasons for any change within that time period. Within the total bed count, the department shall provide the number of temporary and special use beds. 3. Address the department's rationale for eliminating any permanent beds rather than reducing the level of temporary beds. 4. Include any plans to vacate beds but not permanently remove the beds from the bed count. If the department develops a plan after the department submits the report to open or close one hundred or more state correctional facility or private prison rated beds, the department shall submit a plan detailing the proposed bed changes for review by the joint legislative budget committee before implementing these changes. END_STATUTE